Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Sec. 25.25.101.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“child” means an individual, whether over or under the age of majority, who is or is alleged to be owed a duty of support by the individual’s parent or who is or is alleged to be the beneficiary of a support order directed to the parent;

“child support order” means a support order for a child, including a child who has attained the age of majority under the law of the issuing state or foreign country;

“convention” means the Convention on the International Recovery of Child Support and Other Forms of Family Maintenance, concluded at The Hague on November 23, 2007;

“duty of support” means an obligation imposed or imposable by law to provide support for a child, spouse, or former spouse, including an unsatisfied obligation to provide support;

“foreign country” means a country, including a political subdivision of a country, other than the United States, that authorizes the issuance of support orders and

that has been declared under the law of the United States to be a foreign reciprocating country;

that has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with this state as provided in AS

25.25.308(b)

;

that has enacted a law or established procedures for the issuance and enforcement of support orders that are substantially similar to the procedures under this chapter; or

in which the convention is in force with respect to the United States;

“foreign support order” means a support order of a foreign tribunal;

“foreign tribunal” means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity of a foreign country that is authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or determine parentage of a child; “foreign tribunal” includes a competent authority under the convention;

“home state” means the state or the foreign country in which a child lived with a parent or a person acting as a parent for at least six consecutive months immediately preceding the time of filing of a complaint or comparable pleading for support and, if a child is less than six months old, the state or the foreign country in which the child lived from birth with a parent or person acting as a parent; a period of temporary absence of a parent or person acting as a parent is counted as part of the six-month or other period;

“income” includes earnings or other periodic entitlements to money from any source and any other property subject to withholding for support under the law of this state;

“income withholding order” means an order or other legal process directed to an obligor, an obligor’s employer, an obligor’s future employer, or another person, political subdivision, or department of the state, under AS 25.27 to withhold support from the income of the obligor under AS 25.27;

“initiating tribunal” means the tribunal of a state or foreign country from which a complaint or comparable pleading is forwarded or in which a complaint or comparable pleading is filed for forwarding to another state or foreign country;

“issuing foreign country” means the foreign country in which a tribunal issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child;

“issuing state” means the state in which a tribunal issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child;

“issuing tribunal” means the tribunal of a state or foreign country that issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child;

“law” includes decisional and statutory law and rules and regulations having the force of law;

“obligee” means

an individual to whom a duty of support is or is alleged to be owed or in whose favor a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child has been issued;

a foreign country, state, or political subdivision of a state to which the rights under a duty of support or support order have been assigned or that has independent claims based on financial assistance provided to an individual obligee in place of child support;

an individual seeking a judgment determining parentage of the individual’s child; or

a person that is a creditor in a proceeding under AS

25.25.702

—

25.25.714

;

“obligor” means an individual or the estate of a decedent that

owes or is alleged to owe a duty of support;

is alleged but has not been adjudicated to be a parent of a child;

is liable under a support order; or

is a debtor in a proceeding under AS

25.25.702

—

25.25.714

;

“outside this state” means a location in another state or a country other than the United States, whether or not the country is a foreign country;

“person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“register” means to file in a tribunal of this state a support order or judgment issued in another state or a foreign country determining parentage of a child;

“registering tribunal” means the tribunal in which a support order or judgment determining parentage of a child is registered;

“responding state” means a state in which a complaint or comparable pleading for support or to determine parentage of a child is filed or to which a complaint or comparable pleading is forwarded for filing from another state or foreign country;

“responding tribunal” means the authorized tribunal in a responding state or foreign country;

“spousal support order” means a support order for a spouse or former spouse of the obligor;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States; the term “state” includes an Indian nation or tribe;

“support enforcement agency” means a public official, governmental entity, or private agency authorized to

seek enforcement of support orders or laws relating to the duty of support;

seek establishment or modification of child support orders;

request determination of parentage of a child;

attempt to locate obligors or their assets; or

request determination of the controlling child support order;

“support order” means a judgment, decree, order, decision, or directive, whether temporary, final, or subject to modification, issued in a state or foreign country for the benefit of a child, a spouse, or a former spouse, that provides for monetary support, health care, arrearages, retroactive support, or reimbursement for financial assistance provided to an individual obligee in place of child support; “support order” may include related costs and fees, interest, income withholding, automatic adjustment, reasonable attorney fees, and other relief;

“tribunal” means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to determine parentage of a child.

History.

(§ 4 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 48 — 50 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 45 SLA 2009; am §§ 2— 17, 102 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (3), (5) - (7), (12), and (18) - (20) were enacted as paragraphs (23) - (30); renumbered in 2015 to maintain alphabetical order, at which time other paragraphs were also renumbered.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent applicable to the 2009 amendment of paragraph (19) of this section, see § 1, ch. 45, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in (19), added “, the United States Virgin Islands” following “Commonwealth of Puerto Rico”, and “an Indian tribe and” following “the term ‘state’ includes”.

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (2), inserted “or foreign country” following “issuing state”; in (4) [now (8)], twice inserted “or the foreign country” following “the state”; repealed former (7); rewrote (8) [now (11)], which read, “ ‘initiating tribunal’ means the authorized tribunal in an initiating state”; in (9) [now (13)], deleted “renders” following “a support order or”, added “of a child” at the end; in (10) [now (14)], inserted “of a state or foreign country” following “the tribunal”, deleted “renders” following “a support order or”, and added “of a child” at the end; in (12) [now 15)], in (12)(A) [now (15(A)], deleted “has been issued” following “a support order”, and substituted “or a judgment determining parentage of a child has been issued” for “or a judgment determining parentage has been rendered”, in (12)(B) [now (15)(B)], inserted “foreign country” at the beginning, “of a state” following “political subdivision”, and added “in place of child support” at the end, added (12)(D) [now (15)(D)]; added (13)(D) [now (17)(D)]; rewrote (14) [now (21)], which read, “ ‘register’ means to file a support order or judgment with a registering tribunal”; in (15) [now (22)], added “of a child” near the end; rewrote (16) [now (23)], which read, “ ‘responding state’ means a state in which a proceeding is filed or to which a proceeding is forwarded for filing from an initiating state under this chapter or a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter, or under a law or procedure substantially similar to the uniform reciprocal enforcement of support act or the revised uniform reciprocal enforcement of support act”; in (17) [now (24)], added “or foreign country” at the end; in (19) [now (26)], substituted “an Indian nation or tribe” for “an Indian tribe”, and deleted “and a foreign jurisdiction that has enacted a law or established procedures for issuance and enforcement of support orders that are substantially similar to the procedures under this chapter or under the uniform reciprocal enforcement of support act or the revised uniform reciprocal enforcement of support act” at the end; in the introductory language of (20) [now (27)], inserted “, governmental entity” following “a public official”, rewrote (20)(D) [now (27)(D)], which read, “the location of obligors or their assets”, added (20)(E) [now (27)(E)]; rewrote (21) [now (28)], which read, “ ‘support order’ means a judgment, decree, or order, whether temporary, final, or subject to modification, for the benefit of a child, a spouse, or a former spouse, that provides for monetary support, health care, arrearages, or reimbursement, and may include related costs and fees, interest, income withholding, attorney fees, and other relief”; in (22) [now (29)], added “of a child” at the end; added (23) [now (3)], (24) [now (5)], (25) [now (6)], (26) [now (7)], (27) [now (12)], (28) [now (18)], (29) [now (19)], and (30) [now (20)]; made related and stylistic changes throughout.

Sec. 25.25.102.
State tribunal and support enforcement.

The superior court and the child support services agency are the tribunals of this state.

The child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

is the support enforcement agency of this state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 18 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added (b).

Sec. 25.25.103.
Remedies cumulative.

Remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and do not affect the availability of remedies under other law or the recognition of a support order on the basis of comity.

This chapter does not

provide the exclusive method of establishing or enforcing a support order under the law of this state; or

grant a tribunal of this state jurisdiction to render judgment or issue an order relating to child custody or visitation in a proceeding under this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 19, 20 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added “or the recognition of a support order on the basis of comity” at the end of (a), added (b).

Sec. 25.25.104.
Application of this chapter to resident of foreign country and foreign support proceeding.

A tribunal of this state shall apply AS

25.25.101

—

25.25.616

and, as applicable, AS

25.25.702

—

25.25.714

, to a support proceeding involving

a foreign support order;

a foreign tribunal; or

an obligee, obligor, or child residing in a foreign country.

A tribunal of this state that is requested to recognize and enforce a support order on the basis of comity may apply the procedural and substantive provisions of AS

25.25.101

—

25.25.616

.

AS

25.25.702

—

25.25.714

apply only to a support proceeding under the convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of AS

25.25.702

—

25.25.714

is inconsistent with AS

25.25.101

—

25.25.616

, AS 25.25.702 — 25.25.714 controls.

History.

(§ 21 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 107, ch. 32, SLA 2015 makes this section effective July 1, 2015.

Secs. 25.25.110 — 25.25.200.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 57 SLA 1995.]